California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(h) Before authorizing the expenditure of moneys from the fund pursuant to an application of a requesting state, the fund shall ascertain the extent and nature of any timely assistance or participation which may be available from the federal government and shall request the appropriate agency or agencies of the federal government for such assistance and participation.

(i) The fund may negotiate and execute a memorandum of understanding or other appropriate instrument defining the extent and degree of assistance or participation between and among the fund, cooperating federal agencies, states and any other entities concerned. 
 
Article VII. Advisory and Technical Committees
The governing board may establish advisory and technical committees composed of state, local, and federal officials, and private persons to advise it with respect to any one or more of its functions. Any such advisory or technical committee, or any member or members thereof may meet with and participate in its deliberations. Upon request of the governing board or executive committee an advisory or technical committee may furnish information and recommendations with respect to any application for assistance from the fund being considered by such board or committee and the board or committee may receive and consider the same: provided that any participant in a meeting of the governing board or executive committee held pursuant to Article VI(d) of the compact shall be entitled to know the substance of any such information and recommendations, at the time of the meeting if made prior thereto or as a part thereof or, if made thereafter, no later than the time at which the governing board or executive committee makes its disposition of the application. 
 
Article VIII. Relations With Nonparty Jurisdictions
(a) A party state may make application for assistance from the fund in respect of a pest in a nonparty state. Such application shall be considered and disposed of by the governing board or executive committee in the same manner as an application with respect to a pest within a party state, except as provided in this article.

(b) At or in connection with any meeting of the governing board or executive committee held pursuant to Article VI(d) of this compact a nonparty state shall be entitled to appear, participate, and receive information only to such extent as the governing board or executive committee may provide. A nonparty state shall not be entitled to review of any determination made by the executive committee.

(c) The governing board or executive committee shall authorize expenditures from the fund to be made in a nonparty state only after determining that the conditions in such state and the value of such expenditures to the party states as a whole justify them. The governing board or executive committee may set any conditions which it deems appropriate with respect to the expenditure of moneys from the fund in a nonparty state and may enter into such agreement or agreements with nonparty states and other jurisdictions or entities as it may deem necessary or appropriate to protect the interests of the fund with respect to expenditures and activities outside of party states. 
 
Article IX. Finance
(a) The fund shall submit to the executive head or designated officer or officers of each party state a budget for the fund for such period as may be required by the laws of that party state for presentation to the Legislature thereof.

(b) Each of the budgets shall contain specific recommendations of the amount or amounts to be appropriated by each of the party states. The requests for appropriations shall be apportioned among the party states as follows: one-tenth of the total budget in equal shares and the remainder in proportion to the value of agricultural and forest crops and products, excluding animals and animal products produced in each party state. In determining the value of such crops and products the fund may employ such source or sources of information as in its judgment present the most equitable and accurate comparisons among the party states. Each of the budgets and requests for appropriations shall indicate the source or sources used in obtaining information concerning value of products.

(c) The financial assets of the fund shall be maintained in two accounts to be designated respectively as the “operating account” and the “claims account.” The operating account shall consist only of those assets necessary for the administration of the fund during the next ensuing two-year period. The claims account shall contain all moneys not included in the operating account and shall not exceed the amount reasonably estimated to be sufficient to pay all legitimate claims on the fund for a period of three years. At any time when the claims account has reached its maximum limit or would reach its maximum limit by the addition of moneys requested for appropriation by the party states, the governing board shall reduce its budget requests on a pro rata basis in such manner as to keep the claims account within such maximum limit. Any moneys in the claims account by virtue of conditional donations, grants or gifts shall be included in calculations made pursuant to this paragraph only to the extent that such moneys are available to meet demands arising out of claims.

(d) The fund shall not pledge the credit of any party state. The fund may meet any of its obligations in whole or in part with moneys available to it under Article IV(g) of this compact, provided that the governing board takes specific action setting aside such moneys prior to incurring any obligation to be met in whole or in part in such manner. Except where the fund makes use of moneys available to it under Article IV(g) hereof, the fund shall not incur any obligation prior to the allotment of moneys by the party states adequate to meet the same. 

(e) The fund shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the fund shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the fund shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant and a report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the fund.

(f) The accounts of the fund shall be open at any reasonable time for inspection by duly authorized officers of the party states and by any persons authorized by the fund. 
 
Article X. Entry Into Force and Withdrawal
(a) This compact shall enter into force when enacted into law by any five or more states. Thereafter, this compact shall become effective as to any other state upon its enactment thereof.

(b) Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same, but no such withdrawal shall take effect until two years after the executive head of the withdrawing state has given notice in writing of the withdrawal to the executive heads of all other party states. No withdrawal shall affect any liability already incurred by or chargeable to a party state prior to the time of such withdrawal. 
 
Article XI. Construction and Severability
This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state participating herein, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining party states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8802.

Consistent with law and within available appropriations, the departments, agencies, and officers of this state may cooperate with the fund established by the Pest Control Compact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8803.

Pursuant to Article IV(h) of the compact, copies of bylaws and amendments thereto shall be filed with the Office of Administrative Procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8804.

The compact adminstrator for this state is the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8805.

Within the meaning of Article VI(b) or VIII(a), a request or application for assistance from the fund may be made by the Governor whenever in his judgment the conditions qualifying this state for such assistance exist and it would be in the interest of this state to make such request.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8806.

The notice of any meeting at which an application for assistance from the fund is to be considered given pursuant to Article VI(d), shall also be given to the Speaker of the Assembly and the President pro Tempore of the Senate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8807.

The department, agency, or officer expending or becoming liable for an expenditure on account of a control or eradication program undertaken or intensified pursuant to the compact shall have credited to his account in the State Treasury the amount or amounts of any payments made to this state to defray the cost of such program, or any part thereof, or as reimbursement thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8808.

As used in the compact, with reference to this state, the term “executive head” means the Governor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 5. ANIMAL AND POULTRY QUARANTINE AND PEST CONTROL [9101. - 11305.]



PART 1. DISEASED ANIMALS AND POULTRY [9101. - 9702.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [9101. - 9189.]



  ARTICLE 1. Reports [9101. - 9101.]

9101.

(a) The department shall periodically publish and make available a list of reportable conditions that pose or may pose significant threats to public health, animal health, the environment, or the food supply. This document shall be known as the “List of Reportable Conditions for Animals and Animal Products.”

(b) Any licensed veterinarian, any person operating a diagnostic laboratory, or any person who has been informed, recognizes or should recognize, by virtue of education,
 experience, or occupation, that any animal or animal product is or may be affected by, has been exposed to, or may be transmitting or carrying any condition specified in the “List of Reportable Conditions for Animals and Animal Products,” shall report to the department all known information required by the department within the time specified in the “List of Reportable Conditions for Animals and Animal Products.”

(c) For the purposes of this section, “animal” includes any animal, poultry, fowl, bird, or fish.

(d) While the procedure for selecting the conditions required to be reported and the method of preparation and publication of the “List of Reportable Conditions for Animals and Animal Products” shall be established by regulation, the selection of the specific conditions identified in the “List of Reportable Conditions for Animals and Animal Products” and the timeframe for
 reporting those conditions are exempt from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of Government Code.

(e) Until the department publishes the “List of Reportable Conditions for Animals and Animal Products,” the diseases listed in Section 796 of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations shall constitute the conditions required to be reported pursuant to this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 503, Sec. 1.2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Serum [9121. - 9121.]

9121.

Any person that is engaged in stockraising may purchase for injection in his stock any serum used for the cure or prevention of animal diseases.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Disposal of Carcasses [9143. - 9143.]

9143.

An animal which has died from any contagious disease shall not be used for the food of any human being, domestic animal, or fowl.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Laboratory Services [9151. - 9157.]

9151.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Emergency or regulatory condition” includes all diseases or conditions listed as emergency or regulatory conditions in the department’s List of Reportable Conditions for Animals and Animal Products published pursuant to Section 9101.

(b) “Laboratory services” means any of the following:

(1) Providing a residue analysis of animal tissue.

(2) Providing nutrient analysis of animal tissue.

(3) Providing the identification of insects, parasites,
 bacteria, viruses, prions, or any pathogenic organisms in animal tissue.

(4) Providing any other services compatible with, or incidental to, those laboratory services provided pursuant to Section 9152.

(c) “Poultry” and “livestock” have the same meanings as defined in Sections 9502 and 9503.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 495, Sec. 1.   (SB 703)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9152.

The department shall do all of the following:

(a) Require certification of laboratories providing services in the examination, diagnosis, analysis, testing, quantifying, or identification of any emergency or regulatory condition of poultry or livestock owned or located within the state.

(b) Prescribe procedures and requirements for certification.

(c) Develop and implement regulations necessary to carry out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 495, Sec. 1.   (SB 703)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9152.5.

A laboratory approved, certified, or accredited by the state or the federal government to provide services equivalent to those described in subdivision (a) of Section 9152 is exempt from this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 495, Sec. 1.   (SB 703)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9153.

(a) A person shall not establish, operate, or maintain a laboratory that provides services in the examination, diagnosis, analysis, testing, quantifying, or identification of any emergency or regulatory condition of poultry and livestock unless the person obtains a certificate from the department pursuant to this article authorizing the person to establish, operate, and maintain a laboratory that provides these services, except as specified in Section 9152.5.

(b) A person who desires a certificate pursuant to this section shall file an application with the department for a certificate accompanied by the application fee required pursuant to Section 9154.

(c) The application shall be
 on a form prescribed and furnished by the department.

(d) The department shall issue a certificate to an applicant if the department is satisfied that the applicant is documented and verified to have full accreditation and to be in good standing with the American Association of Veterinary Laboratory Diagnosticians or International Organization for Standardization (ISO)/International Electrotechnical Commission (IEC) 17025 current general requirements for the competence of testing and calibration laboratories.

(e) A certificate shall expire one year after the date of issuance. A certificate shall be renewed upon payment of the renewal application fee required pursuant to Section 9154 if the applicant is in compliance with this article and the regulations adopted pursuant to this article.

(f) A certified laboratory
 shall use an official nationally approved or validated diagnostic test for diseases of regulatory importance. A certified laboratory may request permission from the department to use a nonapproved or nonvalidated test.

(g) A certified laboratory shall report positive and suspect positive test results only to the party who provided the original sample and shall also report the test results as required by Section 9101 or any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 495, Sec. 1.   (SB 703)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9154.

(a) Before issuing a certificate pursuant to Section 9153, the department shall require an applicant for a certificate to pay an application fee.

(b) (1) Before January 1, 2023, the application and renewal fees shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) On and after January 1, 2023, the department may adjust the application and renewal fees to cover the department’s reasonable costs to implement laboratory certification requirements.

(c) The fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 495, Sec. 1.   (SB 703)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9155.

(a) The department may refuse to approve or renew a certificate or may suspend or revoke a certificate if the applicant or certificate holder is not in compliance with this article or regulations adopted pursuant to this article. The department shall notify an applicant or certificate holder of the reasons for the action and shall approve or reinstate the certificate when the laboratory is in compliance.

(b) The department shall review an action taken pursuant to subdivision (a) upon request of any person adversely affected by the action, and the decision is subject to appeal in accordance with Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 495, Sec. 1.   (SB 703)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9156.

Test results certified by the department are prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the results for purposes of an action pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 9157. This section does not apply to a criminal action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 495, Sec. 1.   (SB 703)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9157.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 9166, any person who violates Section 9153 shall be liable for a civil penalty of no more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each act constituting a violation of Section 9153.

(2) For the purpose of paragraph (1), an act shall be deemed to be each day a person establishes, operates, or maintains a laboratory without a certificate from the department in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 9153, or every test conducted that violates subdivision (f) or (g) of Section 9153.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 9166, any person who violates any regulation adopted pursuant to this article shall be liable for a civil penalty
 of no more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per day, for any acts constituting a violation of any regulation adopted pursuant to this article, so long as the regulation specifies that a violation is subject to enforcement in accordance with this section.

(c) (1) Unless a civil penalty has been imposed pursuant to paragraph (2), the department may administratively impose a civil penalty for a violation described in subdivision (a) or (b).

(2) Unless the department has administratively imposed a civil penalty pursuant to paragraph (1), the Attorney General, upon request of the State Veterinarian, shall petition the Superior Court to impose, assess, and recover a civil penalty for a violation described in subdivision (a) or (b).

(d) The department shall review an action taken pursuant to
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) upon request of any person adversely affected by the action, and the decision is subject to appeal in accordance with Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) The proceeds of any civil penalty collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(f) If the Attorney General prevails in or settles an action under this section, the Attorney General shall receive an amount for reasonable expenses that the court finds to have been reasonably incurred, plus reasonable costs and attorney’s fees. All expenses, costs, and fees shall be awarded against the defendant and under no circumstances shall they be the responsibility of the state.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 9165, a
 violation of this article is not a crime.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 495, Sec. 1.   (SB 703)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Violations and Penalties [9161. - 9169.]

9161.

It is unlawful for any person to bring, cause to be brought, or aid in bringing into the state any domestic animal which such person knows is infected with any contagious disease.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9163.

Any person that owns or has possession or control of any animal which is affected by any contagious or infectious disease, that fails to keep the animal within an inclosure, or herd the animal in a place where it is secure from contact with other animals of like kind that are not so affected, or that permits the infected animal to be driven on any public highway, is guilty of a misdemeanor, which is punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 105.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

9164.

In order to prevent the spread of any livestock disease, it is unlawful for any person, that does not have a written permit issued by the director, to remove, or cause to be removed, any livestock from slaughterhouse pens, yards, corrals, or similar holding places where livestock is held for the purpose of immediate slaughter, except directly into the slaughterhouse that controls such pens, yards, corrals, or similar holding places.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9165.

Except for Sections 10492 and 10494, any person that violates any provision of this division is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment of not less than 10 days nor more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 106.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

9166.

(a) In addition to any other penalty or fine prescribed by law, any person who violates any provision of this division, or any regulation which is issued pursuant to this division, is subject to an administrative penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation. Each violation during any day constitutes a separate offense. Any money that is recovered under this section shall be paid into the State Treasury and shall be credited to the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(b) If the secretary finds that a violation has occurred, the person charged shall receive notice of the nature of the violation, and shall be given an opportunity to be heard in accordance with Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except that informal hearing procedures may not be used under the circumstances described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 11445.20 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 147, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

9167.

The Attorney General shall, upon complaint by the director, or may, upon his own initiative, if after examination of the complaint and evidence he believes a violation has occurred, bring an action for civil penalties in the name of the people of this state in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state against any person violating any provision of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 646.)
-------------------------------------------

9168.

The Attorney General shall, upon complaint by the director, or may upon his own initiative, if after examination of the complaint and evidence he believes a violation has occurred, bring an action in the name of the people of this state in the superior court for an injunction against any person violating any provision of this division or any regulation which is adopted by the director pursuant to it.

Any proceedings pursuant to this section shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The director shall not, however, be required to allege facts
 necessary to show or tending to show lack of adequate remedy at law or to show or tending to show irreparable damage or loss.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 646.)
-------------------------------------------

9169.

It is unlawful for any person to defeat or interfere with or to attempt to defeat or interfere with any animal disease test authorized by any provision of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 646.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Investigations [9175. - 9175.]

9175.

The secretary may make any necessary investigations relative to reported violations of this division pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 309, Sec. 1.   (SB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Collections [9185. - 9189.]

9185.

Any fees that are provided for by any provision of this division and regulations promulgated pursuant to it shall be due and payable upon receipt of a statement from the department itemizing the kind and amount of those fees. The fees shall be paid to the secretary within 30 days of the receipt of the statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 12.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

9186.

Any fees that are due and payable pursuant to Section 9185 which are not paid may be recovered by the secretary in accordance with the provisions of Section 281.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 13.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

9187.

A penalty assessment of 5 percent per month of the amount of any unpaid fees, not to exceed 25 percent, shall be collected by the secretary when fees are not paid in accordance with Section 9185.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 14.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

9188.

The secretary shall have a lien upon any livestock and real property owned by the person owing any fees due under any provision of this division that are not paid pursuant to Section 9185.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 15.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

9189.

All money which is collected pursuant to this division shall be paid into the State Treasury and shall be credited to the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and may be expended in carrying out the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 646.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Commercial Blood Banks for Animals and Biologics [9201. - 9272.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [9201. - 9201.]

9201.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this chapter:

(a) “Adverse event” means an event in which an animal is injured, sickened, rendered unconscious, or killed.

(b) “Animal” includes, but is not limited to, any domesticated fowl or nonhuman mammal or any wild fowl, bird, or mammal that is reduced to captivity.

(c) “Biologics” means all viruses, serums, antibody products, toxins (excluding substances that are selectively toxic to microorganisms, such as antibiotics), or analogous products at any stage of production, shipment, distribution, or sale, which are intended
 for use in the treatment of animals and that act primarily through the direct stimulation, supplementation, enhancement, or modulation of the immune system or immune response.

(d) “Blood and blood component products” means whole blood collected directly from a donor animal for transfusion or the blood components for transfusion, including packed red blood cells, platelet-rich plasma, platelet concentrates, fresh plasma, fresh frozen plasma, frozen plasma, cryoprecipitate, and cryosupernatant. Antibody products like hyperimmune serums are considered “biologics” and are excluded from this definition of blood and blood component products.

(e) “Captive closed colony” has the same meaning as in Section 4920 of the Business and Professions Code and means that an animal is kept, housed, or maintained in any way for the purpose of collecting its blood.

(f) “Closed-colony blood bank” has the same meaning as in Section 4920 of the Business and Professions Code and means a commercial blood bank for animals that produces animal blood or blood component products solely from animals held in a captive closed colony.

(g) “Commercial blood bank for animals” has the same meaning as in Section 4920 of the Business and Professions Code and means an establishment that produces animal blood or blood component products from captive closed-colony or community-sourced animals to market and sell for use in the cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of injury or disease in animals.

(h) “Community blood bank” has the same meaning as in Section 4920 of the Business and Professions Code and means a commercial blood bank for animals that produces animal blood or blood component products
 solely from community-sourced animals whose owners voluntarily consent to the donation.

(i) “Community sourced” has the same meaning as in Section 4920 of the Business and Professions Code and means that an animal is all of the following:

(1) Kept, housed, and maintained at the residence of its owner who is a person and not a partnership, association, corporation, or limited liability company.

(2) Brought by its owner to a community blood bank to have its blood collected.

(3) Licensed in accordance with any pet licensing required by the pet owner’s state, county, or city of residence.

(j) “Production” has the same meaning as in Section 4920 of the Business and Professions Code and means
 collection of blood or the preparation, testing, processing, storage, or distribution of blood or blood component products for the purpose of transfusion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 5.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Animal Blood and Blood Component Products Production and Biologics Production [9210. - 9212.5.]

9210.

(a) A person shall not engage in the production of animal blood and blood component products for retail sale and distribution except in a captive closed-colony commercial blood bank for animals licensed by the secretary or in accordance with Article 7 (commencing with Section 4920) of Chapter 11 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a community blood bank for animals operating pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 4920) of Chapter 11 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code shall register blood and blood component products with the secretary in accordance with Article 5 (commencing with Section 9241).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 11.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9211.

No person shall engage in the production of biologics except as
 permitted under federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 235, Sec. 10.   (AB 1709)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Became operative on January 1, 2013, pursuant to Sec. 28 of Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

9212.

The secretary shall license establishments as captive closed-colony commercial blood banks for animals that meet all of the following:

(a) Operate under conditions, and use methods of production, that are consistent with current standards of care and practice for the field of veterinary transfusion medicine to ensure that the animal blood and blood component products will not be contaminated, dangerous, or harmful.

(b) Produce animal blood and blood component products under the direct supervision of a person qualified in the field.

(c) Maintain onsite records containing information documenting how the animal was acquired and any history of blood draws or use of
 anesthesia on the animal.

(d) Keep, house, or maintain all animal donors within California state boundaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 12.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9212.5.

(a) (1) The department shall discontinue its licensing program for commercial blood banks for animals that produce canine blood and blood component products sourced from captive closed-colony dogs within 18 months of making a finding and provision of notice as follows:

(A) Based on the quarterly reports required under Section 4920.6 of the Business and Professions Code, subdivision (c) of Section 9252, and subdivision (b) of Section 9253, every three months, the secretary shall calculate the total estimated amount of canine blood sold in California that quarter by community blood banks and, separately, the total estimated amount of canine blood that closed-colony blood banks sold in the state during the same period. This
 information shall be publicly posted on the department’s internet website along with annual totals compiled each year. 

(B) If the secretary finds that community blood banks sold an annual amount of canine blood in California that equals or exceeds the annual amount closed-colony blood banks sold in four consecutive quarters, then the secretary shall provide notice on the department’s internet website that discontinues its licensing program for closed-colony blood banks for dogs within 18 months from the date of that notice.

(2) The calculation of canine blood pursuant to this subdivision shall be done separately, with whole blood, packed red blood cells, and fresh frozen plasma being measured as separate amounts in estimated milliliters based on weight in grams.

(3) For purposes of this section, “canine blood” means
 whole blood, packed red blood cells, and fresh frozen plasma.

(b) Upon enactment of this section, the secretary shall not accept any new applications to license a commercial blood bank for animals that produces canine blood or blood component products sourced from captive closed-colony dogs.

(c) Closed-colony blood banks may transition to community-sourced models and continue to operate in accordance with Article 7 (commencing with Section 4920) of Chapter 11 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 13.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Licenses [9221. - 9222.]

9221.

An application for a license for any establishment that produces, or proposes to produce, animal blood and blood component products from a closed-colony blood bank shall be made on forms issued by the secretary. The application shall contain all of the following:

(a) The name and address of the person who owns the property, establishment, or institution in which it is proposed to produce animal blood and blood component products.

(b) The name and address of the person who shall oversee the production of animal blood and blood component products.

(c) The type of animal blood and blood component products that shall be produced.

(d) A full description of the building, including its address, facilities, equipment, and apparatus, to be used in the production of animal blood and blood component products.

(e) A written protocol, consistent with current standards of care and practice for the field of veterinary transfusion medicine, that addresses all of the following:

(1) Maximum length of time for donation by animal donors, or minimum health parameters for animal donors.

(2) Frequency and amount of blood collected from animal blood donors in estimated milliliters based on weight in grams.

(3) Socialization and exercise programs for animal blood donors.

(4) Method of identification of each animal, including microchip or tattoo.

(5) Ongoing veterinary care, including an annual physical exam and vaccination schedule for animals held in blood donor facilities.

(6) Husbandry standards for feeding, watering, sanitation, housing, handling, and care in transit, with minimums based on the standards set forth pursuant to the federal Animal Welfare Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 2131 et seq.) in Part 3 (commencing with Section 3.1) of Subchapter A of Chapter 1 of Title 9 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(7) Implementation of a permissive adoption program.

(8) Bloodborne pathogen testing for all canine and feline blood donors in accordance with the best clinical practices in the veterinary field, which may
 include the most recent Consensus Statement on blood donor infectious disease screening by the American College of Veterinary Internal Medicine.

(f) An oversight letter identifying the oversight veterinarian who will be responsible for oversight of the facility. The letter shall be from the oversight veterinarian, and shall be maintained on file by the secretary. Oversight veterinarians shall be licensed to practice veterinary medicine in California. In the event of a change of the oversight veterinarian, it is the oversight veterinarian’s responsibility to give notice to the secretary of the termination of the oversight veterinarian within 30 days of the termination date of the oversight veterinarian. An oversight letter from the incoming oversight veterinarian shall be submitted to the secretary within 30 days of the termination date of the prior oversight veterinarian.

(g) Additional information that the secretary finds is necessary for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 14.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9222.

(a) A commercial blood bank for animals shall not discriminate against veterinarians licensed in California in the sale of animal blood or blood component products. 
